Illinois, session 104th, HB5527.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5changing Section 201 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/201)7    Sec. 201. Tax imposed. 8    (a) In general. A tax measured by net income is hereby 9imposed on every individual, corporation, trust and estate for 10each taxable year ending after July 31, 1969 on the privilege 11of earning or receiving income in or as a resident of this 12State. Such tax shall be in addition to all other occupation or 13privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 14corporation or political subdivision thereof.15    (b) Rates. The tax imposed by subsection (a) of this 16Section shall be determined as follows, except as adjusted by 17subsection (d-1):18        (1) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 19    taxable years ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount 20    equal to 2 1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the 21    taxable year.22        (2) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 23    taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending   HB5527- 2 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    after June 30, 1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 2 2    1/2% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 3    July 1, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4    3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 5    30, 1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.6        (3) In the case of an individual, trust or estate, for 7    taxable years beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending 8    prior to January 1, 2011, an amount equal to 3% of the 9    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.10        (4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 11    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and 12    ending after December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum 13    of (i) 3% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 14    to January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 15    (ii) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 16    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5.17        (5) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 18    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2011, 19    and ending prior to January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 5% 20    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.21        (5.1) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 22    for taxable years beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and 23    ending after December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum 24    of (i) 5% of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior 25    to January 1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 26    (ii) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period   HB5527- 3 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    after December 31, 2014, as calculated under Section 2    202.5. 3        (5.2) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 4    for taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2015, 5    and ending prior to July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 3.75% 6    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 7        (5.3) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 8    for taxable years beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and 9    ending after June 30, 2017, an amount equal to the sum of 10    (i) 3.75% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 11    prior to July 1, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, 12    and (ii) 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the period 13    after June 30, 2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 14        (5.4) In the case of an individual, trust, or estate, 15    for taxable years beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an 16    amount equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 17    taxable year. 18        (6) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 19    ending prior to July 1, 1989, an amount equal to 4% of the 20    taxpayer's net income for the taxable year.21        (7) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 22    beginning prior to July 1, 1989 and ending after June 30, 23    1989, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4% of the 24    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 25    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3, and (ii) 4.8% of 26    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30,   HB5527- 4 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    1989, as calculated under Section 202.3.2        (8) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 3    beginning after June 30, 1989, and ending prior to January 4    1, 2011, an amount equal to 4.8% of the taxpayer's net 5    income for the taxable year.6        (9) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 7    beginning prior to January 1, 2011, and ending after 8    December 31, 2010, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 4.8% 9    of the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to 10    January 1, 2011, as calculated under Section 202.5, and 11    (ii) 7% of the taxpayer's net income for the period after 12    December 31, 2010, as calculated under Section 202.5. 13        (10) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 14    beginning on or after January 1, 2011, and ending prior to 15    January 1, 2015, an amount equal to 7% of the taxpayer's 16    net income for the taxable year. 17        (11) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 18    beginning prior to January 1, 2015, and ending after 19    December 31, 2014, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 7% of 20    the taxpayer's net income for the period prior to January 21    1, 2015, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 5.25% 22    of the taxpayer's net income for the period after December 23    31, 2014, as calculated under Section 202.5. 24        (12) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 25    beginning on or after January 1, 2015, and ending prior to 26    July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 5.25% of the taxpayer's   HB5527- 5 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    net income for the taxable year. 2        (13) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 3    beginning prior to July 1, 2017, and ending after June 30, 4    2017, an amount equal to the sum of (i) 5.25% of the 5    taxpayer's net income for the period prior to July 1, 6    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5, and (ii) 7% of 7    the taxpayer's net income for the period after June 30, 8    2017, as calculated under Section 202.5. 9        (14) In the case of a corporation, for taxable years 10    beginning on or after July 1, 2017, an amount equal to 7% 11    of the taxpayer's net income for the taxable year. 12    The rates under this subsection (b) are subject to the 13provisions of Section 201.5. 14    (b-5) Surcharge; sale or exchange of assets, properties, 15and intangibles of organization gaming licensees. For each of 16taxable years 2019 through 2027, a surcharge is imposed on all 17taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 18capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 19used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles (i) 20of an organization licensee under the Illinois Horse Racing 21Act of 1975 and (ii) of an organization gaming licensee under 22the Illinois Gambling Act. The amount of the surcharge is 23equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 24taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 25surcharge imposed shall not apply if: 26        (1) the organization gaming license, organization   HB5527- 6 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    license, or racetrack property is transferred as a result 2    of any of the following:3            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 4        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 5        licensee or the substantial owners of the initial 6        licensee;7            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 8        any such license by the Illinois Gaming Board or the 9        Illinois Racing Board;10            (C) a determination by the Illinois Gaming Board 11        that transfer of the license is in the best interests 12        of Illinois gaming;13            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 14        a licensee;15            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 16        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 17        publicly traded company;18            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 19        owned subsidiary; or20            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 21        another person where both persons were initial owners 22        of the license when the license was issued; or 23        (2) the controlling interest in the organization 24    gaming license, organization license, or racetrack 25    property is transferred in a transaction to lineal 26    descendants in which no gain or loss is recognized or as a   HB5527- 7 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    result of a transaction in accordance with Section 351 of 2    the Internal Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is 3    recognized; or4        (3) live horse racing was not conducted in 2010 at a 5    racetrack located within 3 miles of the Mississippi River 6    under a license issued pursuant to the Illinois Horse 7    Racing Act of 1975. 8    The transfer of an organization gaming license, 9organization license, or racetrack property by a person other 10than the initial licensee to receive the organization gaming 11license is not subject to a surcharge. The Department shall 12adopt rules necessary to implement and administer this 13subsection. 14    (c) Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax. 15Beginning on July 1, 1979 and thereafter, in addition to such 16income tax, there is also hereby imposed the Personal Property 17Tax Replacement Income Tax measured by net income on every 18corporation (including Subchapter S corporations), partnership 19and trust, for each taxable year ending after June 30, 1979. 20Such taxes are imposed on the privilege of earning or 21receiving income in or as a resident of this State. The 22Personal Property Tax Replacement Income Tax shall be in 23addition to the income tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 24of this Section and in addition to all other occupation or 25privilege taxes imposed by this State or by any municipal 26corporation or political subdivision thereof.  HB5527- 8 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    (d) Additional Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 2Tax Rates. The personal property tax replacement income tax 3imposed by this subsection and subsection (c) of this Section 4in the case of a corporation, other than a Subchapter S 5corporation and except as adjusted by subsection (d-1), shall 6be an additional amount equal to 2.85% of such taxpayer's net 7income for the taxable year, except that beginning on January 81, 1981, and thereafter, the rate of 2.85% specified in this 9subsection shall be reduced to 2.5%, and in the case of a 10partnership, trust or a Subchapter S corporation shall be an 11additional amount equal to 1.5% of such taxpayer's net income 12for the taxable year.13    (d-1) Rate reduction for certain foreign insurers. In the 14case of a foreign insurer, as defined by Section 35A-5 of the 15Illinois Insurance Code, whose state or country of domicile 16imposes on insurers domiciled in Illinois a retaliatory tax 17(excluding any insurer whose premiums from reinsurance assumed 18are 50% or more of its total insurance premiums as determined 19under paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of Section 304, except 20that for purposes of this determination premiums from 21reinsurance do not include premiums from inter-affiliate 22reinsurance arrangements), beginning with taxable years ending 23on or after December 31, 1999, the sum of the rates of tax 24imposed by subsections (b) and (d) shall be reduced (but not 25increased) to the rate at which the total amount of tax imposed 26under this Act, net of all credits allowed under this Act,   HB5527- 9 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1shall equal (i) the total amount of tax that would be imposed 2on the foreign insurer's net income allocable to Illinois for 3the taxable year by such foreign insurer's state or country of 4domicile if that net income were subject to all income taxes 5and taxes measured by net income imposed by such foreign 6insurer's state or country of domicile, net of all credits 7allowed or (ii) a rate of zero if no such tax is imposed on 8such income by the foreign insurer's state of domicile. For 9the purposes of this subsection (d-1), an inter-affiliate 10includes a mutual insurer under common management.11        (1) For the purposes of subsection (d-1), in no event 12    shall the sum of the rates of tax imposed by subsections 13    (b) and (d) be reduced below the rate at which the sum of:14            (A) the total amount of tax imposed on such 15        foreign insurer under this Act for a taxable year, net 16        of all credits allowed under this Act, plus17            (B) the privilege tax imposed by Section 409 of 18        the Illinois Insurance Code, the fire insurance 19        company tax imposed by Section 12 of the Fire 20        Investigation Act, and the fire department taxes 21        imposed under Section 11-10-1 of the Illinois 22        Municipal Code,23    equals 1.25% for taxable years ending prior to December 24    31, 2003, or 1.75% for taxable years ending on or after 25    December 31, 2003, of the net taxable premiums written for 26    the taxable year, as described by subsection (1) of   HB5527- 10 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    Section 409 of the Illinois Insurance Code. This paragraph 2    will in no event increase the rates imposed under 3    subsections (b) and (d).4        (2) Any reduction in the rates of tax imposed by this 5    subsection shall be applied first against the rates 6    imposed by subsection (b) and only after the tax imposed 7    by subsection (a) net of all credits allowed under this 8    Section other than the credit allowed under subsection (i) 9    has been reduced to zero, against the rates imposed by 10    subsection (d).11    This subsection (d-1) is exempt from the provisions of 12Section 250.13    (e) Investment credit. A taxpayer shall be allowed a 14credit against the Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 15Tax for investment in qualified property.16        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit equal to .5% 17    of the basis of qualified property placed in service 18    during the taxable year, provided such property is placed 19    in service on or after July 1, 1984. There shall be allowed 20    an additional credit equal to .5% of the basis of 21    qualified property placed in service during the taxable 22    year, provided such property is placed in service on or 23    after July 1, 1986, and the taxpayer's base employment 24    within Illinois has increased by 1% or more over the 25    preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's employment 26    records filed with the Illinois Department of Employment   HB5527- 11 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois shall be 2    deemed to have met the 1% growth in base employment for the 3    first year in which they file employment records with the 4    Illinois Department of Employment Security. The provisions 5    added to this Section by Public Act 85-1200 (and restored 6    by Public Act 87-895) shall be construed as declaratory of 7    existing law and not as a new enactment. If, in any year, 8    the increase in base employment within Illinois over the 9    preceding year is less than 1%, the additional credit 10    shall be limited to that percentage times a fraction, the 11    numerator of which is .5% and the denominator of which is 12    1%, but shall not exceed .5%. The investment credit shall 13    not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 14    taxpayer's liability in any tax year below zero, nor may 15    any credit for qualified property be allowed for any year 16    other than the year in which the property was placed in 17    service in Illinois. For tax years ending on or after 18    December 31, 1987, and on or before December 31, 1988, the 19    credit shall be allowed for the tax year in which the 20    property is placed in service, or, if the amount of the 21    credit exceeds the tax liability for that year, whether it 22    exceeds the original liability or the liability as later 23    amended, such excess may be carried forward and applied to 24    the tax liability of the 5 taxable years following the 25    excess credit years if the taxpayer (i) makes investments 26    which cause the creation of a minimum of 2,000 full-time   HB5527- 12 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    equivalent jobs in Illinois, (ii) is located in an 2    enterprise zone established pursuant to the Illinois 3    Enterprise Zone Act and (iii) is certified by the 4    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 5    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity) as 6    complying with the requirements specified in clause (i) 7    and (ii) by July 1, 1986. The Department of Commerce and 8    Community Affairs (now Department of Commerce and Economic 9    Opportunity) shall notify the Department of Revenue of all 10    such certifications immediately. For tax years ending 11    after December 31, 1988, the credit shall be allowed for 12    the tax year in which the property is placed in service, 13    or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax liability 14    for that year, whether it exceeds the original liability 15    or the liability as later amended, such excess may be 16    carried forward and applied to the tax liability of the 5 17    taxable years following the excess credit years. The 18    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 19    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 20    tax year that is available to offset a liability, earlier 21    credit shall be applied first.22        (2) The term "qualified property" means property 23    which:24            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 25        buildings and structural components of buildings and 26        signs that are real property, but not including land   HB5527- 13 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        or improvements to real property that are not a 2        structural component of a building such as 3        landscaping, sewer lines, local access roads, fencing, 4        parking lots, and other appurtenances;5            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 6        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 7        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 8        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 9        (e);10            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 11        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;12            (D) is used in Illinois by a taxpayer who is 13        primarily engaged in manufacturing, or in mining coal 14        or fluorite, or in retailing, or was placed in service 15        on or after July 1, 2006 in a River Edge Redevelopment 16        Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 17        Redevelopment Zone Act; and18            (E) has not previously been used in Illinois in 19        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for 20        the credit provided by this subsection (e) or 21        subsection (f).22        (3) For purposes of this subsection (e), 23    "manufacturing" means the material staging and production 24    of tangible personal property by procedures commonly 25    regarded as manufacturing, processing, fabrication, or 26    assembling which changes some existing material into new   HB5527- 14 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    shapes, new qualities, or new combinations. For purposes 2    of this subsection (e) the term "mining" shall have the 3    same meaning as the term "mining" in Section 613(c) of the 4    Internal Revenue Code. For purposes of this subsection 5    (e), the term "retailing" means the sale of tangible 6    personal property for use or consumption and not for 7    resale, or services rendered in conjunction with the sale 8    of tangible personal property for use or consumption and 9    not for resale. For purposes of this subsection (e), 10    "tangible personal property" has the same meaning as when 11    that term is used in the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, 12    and, for taxable years ending after December 31, 2008, 13    does not include the generation, transmission, or 14    distribution of electricity.15        (4) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 16    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 17    income tax purposes.18        (5) If the basis of the property for federal income 19    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 20    placed in service in Illinois by the taxpayer, the amount 21    of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 22    service on the date of such increase in basis.23        (6) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 24    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.25        (7) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 26    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within   HB5527- 15 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 2    any qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 3    months after being placed in service, the Personal 4    Property Tax Replacement Income Tax for such taxable year 5    shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined by 6    (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 7    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 8    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 9    property from such computation and, (ii) subtracting such 10    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 11    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (7), a 12    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 13    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 14    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 15    of such reduction.16        (8) Unless the investment credit is extended by law, 17    the basis of qualified property shall not include costs 18    incurred after December 31, 2018, except for costs 19    incurred pursuant to a binding contract entered into on or 20    before December 31, 2018.21        (9) Each taxable year ending before December 31, 2000, 22    a partnership may elect to pass through to its partners 23    the credits to which the partnership is entitled under 24    this subsection (e) for the taxable year. A partner may 25    use the credit allocated to him or her under this 26    paragraph only against the tax imposed in subsections (c)   HB5527- 16 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    and (d) of this Section. If the partnership makes that 2    election, those credits shall be allocated among the 3    partners in the partnership in accordance with the rules 4    set forth in Section 704(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, 5    and the rules promulgated under that Section, and the 6    allocated amount of the credits shall be allowed to the 7    partners for that taxable year. The partnership shall make 8    this election on its Personal Property Tax Replacement 9    Income Tax return for that taxable year. The election to 10    pass through the credits shall be irrevocable.11        For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 12    2000, a partner that qualifies its partnership for a 13    subtraction under subparagraph (I) of paragraph (2) of 14    subsection (d) of Section 203 or a shareholder that 15    qualifies a Subchapter S corporation for a subtraction 16    under subparagraph (S) of paragraph (2) of subsection (b) 17    of Section 203 shall be allowed a credit under this 18    subsection (e) equal to its share of the credit earned 19    under this subsection (e) during the taxable year by the 20    partnership or Subchapter S corporation, determined in 21    accordance with the determination of income and 22    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 23    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. This 24    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 250.25    (f) Investment credit; Enterprise Zone; River Edge 26Redevelopment Zone.  HB5527- 17 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        (1) A taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the 2    tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 3    investment in qualified property which is placed in 4    service in an Enterprise Zone created pursuant to the 5    Illinois Enterprise Zone Act or, for property placed in 6    service on or after July 1, 2006, a River Edge 7    Redevelopment Zone established pursuant to the River Edge 8    Redevelopment Zone Act. For partners, shareholders of 9    Subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability 10    companies, if the liability company is treated as a 11    partnership for purposes of federal and State income 12    taxation, for taxable years ending before December 31, 13    2023, there shall be allowed a credit under this 14    subsection (f) to be determined in accordance with the 15    determination of income and distributive share of income 16    under Sections 702 and 704 and Subchapter S of the 17    Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years ending on or 18    after December 31, 2023, for partners and shareholders of 19    Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of Section 251 20    shall apply with respect to the credit under this 21    subsection. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 22    property. The credit shall be available only in the 23    taxable year in which the property is placed in service in 24    the Enterprise Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone and 25    shall not be allowed to the extent that it would reduce a 26    taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by subsections   HB5527- 18 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For tax years 2    ending on or after December 31, 1985, the credit shall be 3    allowed for the tax year in which the property is placed in 4    service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds the tax 5    liability for that year, whether it exceeds the original 6    liability or the liability as later amended, such excess 7    may be carried forward and applied to the tax liability of 8    the 5 taxable years following the excess credit year. The 9    credit shall be applied to the earliest year for which 10    there is a liability. If there is credit from more than one 11    tax year that is available to offset a liability, the 12    credit accruing first in time shall be applied first.13        (2) The term qualified property means property which:14            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including 15        buildings and structural components of buildings;16            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 17        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 18        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 19        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 20        (f);21            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 22        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code;23            (D) is used in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 24        Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer; and25            (E) has not been previously used in Illinois in 26        such a manner and by such a person as would qualify for   HB5527- 19 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        the credit provided by this subsection (f) or 2        subsection (e).3        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 4    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 5    income tax purposes.6        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 7    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 8    placed in service in the Enterprise Zone or River Edge 9    Redevelopment Zone by the taxpayer, the amount of such 10    increase shall be deemed property placed in service on the 11    date of such increase in basis.12        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 13    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.14        (6) If during any taxable year, any property ceases to 15    be qualified property in the hands of the taxpayer within 16    48 months after being placed in service, or the situs of 17    any qualified property is moved outside the Enterprise 18    Zone or River Edge Redevelopment Zone within 48 months 19    after being placed in service, the tax imposed under 20    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such taxable 21    year shall be increased. Such increase shall be determined 22    by (i) recomputing the investment credit which would have 23    been allowed for the year in which credit for such 24    property was originally allowed by eliminating such 25    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 26    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously   HB5527- 20 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 2    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 3    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 4    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 5    of such reduction.6        (7) There shall be allowed an additional credit equal 7    to 0.5% of the basis of qualified property placed in 8    service during the taxable year in a River Edge 9    Redevelopment Zone, provided such property is placed in 10    service on or after July 1, 2006, and the taxpayer's base 11    employment within Illinois has increased by 1% or more 12    over the preceding year as determined by the taxpayer's 13    employment records filed with the Illinois Department of 14    Employment Security. Taxpayers who are new to Illinois 15    shall be deemed to have met the 1% growth in base 16    employment for the first year in which they file 17    employment records with the Illinois Department of 18    Employment Security. If, in any year, the increase in base 19    employment within Illinois over the preceding year is less 20    than 1%, the additional credit shall be limited to that 21    percentage times a fraction, the numerator of which is 22    0.5% and the denominator of which is 1%, but shall not 23    exceed 0.5%. 24        (8) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 25    2021, there shall be allowed an Enterprise Zone 26    construction jobs credit against the taxes imposed under   HB5527- 21 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section as provided in 2    Section 13 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 3        The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 4    liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 5    credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may 6    be carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's 7    liability in succeeding calendar years in the same manner 8    provided under paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. 9    The credit or credits shall be applied to the earliest 10    year for which there is a tax liability. If there are 11    credits from more than one taxable year that are available 12    to offset a liability, the earlier credit shall be applied 13    first. 14        For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S 15    corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, 16    if the liability company is treated as a partnership for 17    the purposes of federal and State income taxation, for 18    taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 19    be allowed a credit under this Section to be determined in 20    accordance with the determination of income and 21    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 22    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable 23    years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners 24    and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 25    provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 26    credit under this subsection.  HB5527- 22 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under 2    the Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) 3    shall not exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 4        This paragraph (8) is exempt from the provisions of 5    Section 250. 6    (g) (Blank).7    (h) Investment credit; High Impact Business.8        (1) Subject to subsections (b) and (b-5) of Section 9    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act, a taxpayer shall 10    be allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 11    (a) and (b) of this Section for investment in qualified 12    property which is placed in service by a Department of 13    Commerce and Economic Opportunity designated High Impact 14    Business. The credit shall be .5% of the basis for such 15    property. The credit shall not be available (i) until the 16    minimum investments in qualified property set forth in 17    subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois 18    Enterprise Zone Act have been satisfied or (ii) until the 19    time authorized in subsection (b-5) of the Illinois 20    Enterprise Zone Act for entities designated as High Impact 21    Businesses under subdivisions (a)(3)(B), (a)(3)(C), and 22    (a)(3)(D) of Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone 23    Act, and shall not be allowed to the extent that it would 24    reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 25    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. The 26    credit applicable to such investments shall be taken in   HB5527- 23 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    the taxable year in which such investments have been 2    completed. The credit for additional investments beyond 3    the minimum investment by a designated high impact 4    business authorized under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of Section 5    5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act shall be available 6    only in the taxable year in which the property is placed in 7    service and shall not be allowed to the extent that it 8    would reduce a taxpayer's liability for the tax imposed by 9    subsections (a) and (b) of this Section to below zero. For 10    tax years ending on or after December 31, 1987, the credit 11    shall be allowed for the tax year in which the property is 12    placed in service, or, if the amount of the credit exceeds 13    the tax liability for that year, whether it exceeds the 14    original liability or the liability as later amended, such 15    excess may be carried forward and applied to the tax 16    liability of the 5 taxable years following the excess 17    credit year. The credit shall be applied to the earliest 18    year for which there is a liability. If there is credit 19    from more than one tax year that is available to offset a 20    liability, the credit accruing first in time shall be 21    applied first.22        Changes made in this subdivision (h)(1) by Public Act 23    88-670 restore changes made by Public Act 85-1182 and 24    reflect existing law.25        (2) The term qualified property means property which:26            (A) is tangible, whether new or used, including   HB5527- 24 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        buildings and structural components of buildings;2            (B) is depreciable pursuant to Section 167 of the 3        Internal Revenue Code, except that "3-year property" 4        as defined in Section 168(c)(2)(A) of that Code is not 5        eligible for the credit provided by this subsection 6        (h);7            (C) is acquired by purchase as defined in Section 8        179(d) of the Internal Revenue Code; and9            (D) is not eligible for the Enterprise Zone 10        Investment Credit provided by subsection (f) of this 11        Section.12        (3) The basis of qualified property shall be the basis 13    used to compute the depreciation deduction for federal 14    income tax purposes.15        (4) If the basis of the property for federal income 16    tax depreciation purposes is increased after it has been 17    placed in service in a federally designated Foreign Trade 18    Zone or Sub-Zone located in Illinois by the taxpayer, the 19    amount of such increase shall be deemed property placed in 20    service on the date of such increase in basis.21        (5) The term "placed in service" shall have the same 22    meaning as under Section 46 of the Internal Revenue Code.23        (6) If during any taxable year ending on or before 24    December 31, 1996, any property ceases to be qualified 25    property in the hands of the taxpayer within 48 months 26    after being placed in service, or the situs of any   HB5527- 25 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    qualified property is moved outside Illinois within 48 2    months after being placed in service, the tax imposed 3    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for such 4    taxable year shall be increased. Such increase shall be 5    determined by (i) recomputing the investment credit which 6    would have been allowed for the year in which credit for 7    such property was originally allowed by eliminating such 8    property from such computation, and (ii) subtracting such 9    recomputed credit from the amount of credit previously 10    allowed. For the purposes of this paragraph (6), a 11    reduction of the basis of qualified property resulting 12    from a redetermination of the purchase price shall be 13    deemed a disposition of qualified property to the extent 14    of such reduction.15        (7) Beginning with tax years ending after December 31, 16    1996, if a taxpayer qualifies for the credit under this 17    subsection (h) and thereby is granted a tax abatement and 18    the taxpayer relocates its entire facility in violation of 19    the explicit terms and length of the contract under 20    Section 18-183 of the Property Tax Code, the tax imposed 21    under subsections (a) and (b) of this Section shall be 22    increased for the taxable year in which the taxpayer 23    relocated its facility by an amount equal to the amount of 24    credit received by the taxpayer under this subsection (h).25    (h-5) High Impact Business construction jobs credit. For 26taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2021, there   HB5527- 26 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1shall also be allowed a High Impact Business construction jobs 2credit against the tax imposed under subsections (a) and (b) 3of this Section as provided in subsections (i) and (j) of 4Section 5.5 of the Illinois Enterprise Zone Act. 5    The credit or credits may not reduce the taxpayer's 6liability to less than zero. If the amount of the credit or 7credits exceeds the taxpayer's liability, the excess may be 8carried forward and applied against the taxpayer's liability 9in succeeding calendar years in the manner provided under 10paragraph (4) of Section 211 of this Act. The credit or credits 11shall be applied to the earliest year for which there is a tax 12liability. If there are credits from more than one taxable 13year that are available to offset a liability, the earlier 14credit shall be applied first. 15    For partners, shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 16and owners of limited liability companies, for taxable years 17ending before December 31, 2023, if the liability company is 18treated as a partnership for the purposes of federal and State 19income taxation, there shall be allowed a credit under this 20Section to be determined in accordance with the determination 21of income and distributive share of income under Sections 702 22and 704 and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For 23taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, for 24partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the 25provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 26credit under this subsection.  HB5527- 27 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    The total aggregate amount of credits awarded under the 2Blue Collar Jobs Act (Article 20 of Public Act 101-9) shall not 3exceed $20,000,000 in any State fiscal year. 4    This subsection (h-5) is exempt from the provisions of 5Section 250. 6    (i) Credit for Personal Property Tax Replacement Income 7Tax. For tax years ending prior to December 31, 2003, a credit 8shall be allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) 9and (b) of this Section for the tax imposed by subsections (c) 10and (d) of this Section. This credit shall be computed by 11multiplying the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 12Section by a fraction, the numerator of which is base income 13allocable to Illinois and the denominator of which is Illinois 14base income, and further multiplying the product by the tax 15rate imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section.16    Any credit earned on or after December 31, 1986 under this 17subsection which is unused in the year the credit is computed 18because it exceeds the tax liability imposed by subsections 19(a) and (b) for that year (whether it exceeds the original 20liability or the liability as later amended) may be carried 21forward and applied to the tax liability imposed by 22subsections (a) and (b) of the 5 taxable years following the 23excess credit year, provided that no credit may be carried 24forward to any year ending on or after December 31, 2003. This 25credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for which 26there is a liability. If there is a credit under this   HB5527- 28 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1subsection from more than one tax year that is available to 2offset a liability the earliest credit arising under this 3subsection shall be applied first.4    If, during any taxable year ending on or after December 531, 1986, the tax imposed by subsections (c) and (d) of this 6Section for which a taxpayer has claimed a credit under this 7subsection (i) is reduced, the amount of credit for such tax 8shall also be reduced. Such reduction shall be determined by 9recomputing the credit to take into account the reduced tax 10imposed by subsections (c) and (d). If any portion of the 11reduced amount of credit has been carried to a different 12taxable year, an amended return shall be filed for such 13taxable year to reduce the amount of credit claimed.14    (j) Training expense credit. Beginning with tax years 15ending on or after December 31, 1986 and prior to December 31, 162003, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 17imposed by subsections (a) and (b) under this Section for all 18amounts paid or accrued, on behalf of all persons employed by 19the taxpayer in Illinois or Illinois residents employed 20outside of Illinois by a taxpayer, for educational or 21vocational training in semi-technical or technical fields or 22semi-skilled or skilled fields, which were deducted from gross 23income in the computation of taxable income. The credit 24against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) shall be 251.6% of such training expenses. For partners, shareholders of 26subchapter S corporations, and owners of limited liability   HB5527- 29 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1companies, if the liability company is treated as a 2partnership for purposes of federal and State income taxation, 3for taxable years ending before December 31, 2023, there shall 4be allowed a credit under this subsection (j) to be determined 5in accordance with the determination of income and 6distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 and 7subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. For taxable years 8ending on or after December 31, 2023, for partners and 9shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, the provisions of 10Section 251 shall apply with respect to the credit under this 11subsection.12    Any credit allowed under this subsection which is unused 13in the year the credit is earned may be carried forward to each 14of the 5 taxable years following the year for which the credit 15is first computed until it is used. This credit shall be 16applied first to the earliest year for which there is a 17liability. If there is a credit under this subsection from 18more than one tax year that is available to offset a liability, 19the earliest credit arising under this subsection shall be 20applied first. No carryforward credit may be claimed in any 21tax year ending on or after December 31, 2003.22    (k) Research and development credit. For tax years ending 23after July 1, 1990 and prior to December 31, 2003, and 24beginning again for tax years ending on or after December 31, 252004, and ending prior to January 1, 2032, a taxpayer shall be 26allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a)   HB5527- 30 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1and (b) of this Section for increasing research activities in 2this State. The credit allowed against the tax imposed by 3subsections (a) and (b) shall be equal to 6 1/2% of the 4qualifying expenditures for increasing research activities in 5this State. For partners, shareholders of subchapter S 6corporations, and owners of limited liability companies, if 7the liability company is treated as a partnership for purposes 8of federal and State income taxation, for taxable years ending 9before December 31, 2023, there shall be allowed a credit 10under this subsection to be determined in accordance with the 11determination of income and distributive share of income under 12Sections 702 and 704 and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue 13Code. For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2023, 14for partners and shareholders of Subchapter S corporations, 15the provisions of Section 251 shall apply with respect to the 16credit under this subsection.17    For purposes of this subsection: ,18    "Base period" means the 3 taxable years immediately 19preceding the taxable year for which the determination is 20being made. 21    "Qualifying "qualifying expenditures" means the qualifying 22expenditures as defined for the federal credit for increasing 23research activities which would be allowable under Section 41 24of the Internal Revenue Code and which are conducted in this 25State. ,26    "Qualifying "qualifying expenditures for increasing   HB5527- 31 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1research activities in this State" means: (1) for taxable 2years ending before December 31, 2026, the excess of 3qualifying expenditures for the taxable year in which incurred 4over qualifying expenditures for the base period; and (2) for 5taxable years ending on or after December 31, 2026, the excess 6of qualifying expenditures for the taxable year in which 7incurred over 50% of the qualifying expenditures for the base 8period. ,9    "Qualifying "qualifying expenditures for the base period" 10means the average of the qualifying expenditures for each year 11in the base period, and "base period" means the 3 taxable years 12immediately preceding the taxable year for which the 13determination is being made.14    Any credit in excess of the tax liability for the taxable 15year may be carried forward. A taxpayer may elect to have the 16unused credit shown on its final completed return carried over 17as a credit against the tax liability for the following 5 18taxable years or until it has been fully used, whichever 19occurs first; provided that no credit earned in a tax year 20ending prior to December 31, 2003 may be carried forward to any 21year ending on or after December 31, 2003.22    If an unused credit is carried forward to a given year from 232 or more earlier years, that credit arising in the earliest 24year will be applied first against the tax liability for the 25given year. If a tax liability for the given year still 26remains, the credit from the next earliest year will then be   HB5527- 32 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1applied, and so on, until all credits have been used or no tax 2liability for the given year remains. Any remaining unused 3credit or credits then will be carried forward to the next 4following year in which a tax liability is incurred, except 5that no credit can be carried forward to a year which is more 6than 5 years after the year in which the expense for which the 7credit is given was incurred.8    No inference shall be drawn from Public Act 91-644 in 9construing this Section for taxable years beginning before 10January 1, 1999.11    It is the intent of the General Assembly that the research 12and development credit under this subsection (k) shall apply 13continuously for all tax years ending on or after December 31, 142004 and ending prior to January 1, 2032, including, but not 15limited to, the period beginning on January 1, 2016 and ending 16on July 6, 2017 (the effective date of Public Act 100-22). All 17actions taken in reliance on the continuation of the credit 18under this subsection (k) by any taxpayer are hereby 19validated. 20    This subsection (k) is exempt from the provisions of 21Section 250. 22    (l) Environmental Remediation Tax Credit.23        (i) For tax years ending after December 31, 1997 and 24    on or before December 31, 2001, a taxpayer shall be 25    allowed a credit against the tax imposed by subsections 26    (a) and (b) of this Section for certain amounts paid for   HB5527- 33 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs, as specified in 2    this subsection. For purposes of this Section, 3    "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" means costs 4    approved by the Illinois Environmental Protection Agency 5    ("Agency") under Section 58.14 of the Environmental 6    Protection Act that were paid in performing environmental 7    remediation at a site for which a No Further Remediation 8    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 9    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 10    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval 11    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 12    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 13    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 14    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 15    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 16    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 17    of the Environmental Protection Act. After the Pollution 18    Control Board rules are adopted pursuant to the Illinois 19    Administrative Procedure Act for the administration and 20    enforcement of Section 58.9 of the Environmental 21    Protection Act, determinations as to credit availability 22    for purposes of this Section shall be made consistent with 23    those rules. For purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" 24    includes a person whose tax attributes the taxpayer has 25    succeeded to under Section 381 of the Internal Revenue 26    Code and "related party" includes the persons disallowed a   HB5527- 34 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    deduction for losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of 2    Section 267 of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of 3    being a related taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. 4    The credit allowed against the tax imposed by subsections 5    (a) and (b) shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed 6    eligible remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site, 7    except that the $100,000 threshold shall not apply to any 8    site contained in an enterprise zone as determined by the 9    Department of Commerce and Community Affairs (now 10    Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity). The 11    total credit allowed shall not exceed $40,000 per year 12    with a maximum total of $150,000 per site. For partners 13    and shareholders of subchapter S corporations, there shall 14    be allowed a credit under this subsection to be determined 15    in accordance with the determination of income and 16    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704 17    and subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code.18        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 19    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 20    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 21    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. The 22    term "unused credit" does not include any amounts of 23    unreimbursed eligible remediation costs in excess of the 24    maximum credit per site authorized under paragraph (i). 25    This credit shall be applied first to the earliest year 26    for which there is a liability. If there is a credit under   HB5527- 35 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    this subsection from more than one tax year that is 2    available to offset a liability, the earliest credit 3    arising under this subsection shall be applied first. A 4    credit allowed under this subsection may be sold to a 5    buyer as part of a sale of all or part of the remediation 6    site for which the credit was granted. The purchaser of a 7    remediation site and the tax credit shall succeed to the 8    unused credit and remaining carry-forward period of the 9    seller. To perfect the transfer, the assignor shall record 10    the transfer in the chain of title for the site and provide 11    written notice to the Director of the Illinois Department 12    of Revenue of the assignor's intent to sell the 13    remediation site and the amount of the tax credit to be 14    transferred as a portion of the sale. In no event may a 15    credit be transferred to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or a 16    related party would not be eligible under the provisions 17    of subsection (i).18        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 19    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 20    Environmental Protection Act.21    (m) Education expense credit. Beginning with tax years 22ending after December 31, 1999, a taxpayer who is the 23custodian of one or more qualifying pupils shall be allowed a 24credit against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of 25this Section for qualified education expenses incurred on 26behalf of the qualifying pupils. The credit shall be equal to   HB5527- 36 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b125% of qualified education expenses, but in no event may the 2total credit under this subsection claimed by a family that is 3the custodian of qualifying pupils exceed (i) $500 for tax 4years ending prior to December 31, 2017, and (ii) $750 for tax 5years ending on or after December 31, 2017. In no event shall a 6credit under this subsection reduce the taxpayer's liability 7under this Act to less than zero. Notwithstanding any other 8provision of law, for taxable years beginning on or after 9January 1, 2017, no taxpayer may claim a credit under this 10subsection (m) if the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the 11taxable year exceeds (i) $500,000, in the case of spouses 12filing a joint federal tax return or (ii) $250,000, in the case 13of all other taxpayers. This subsection is exempt from the 14provisions of Section 250 of this Act.15    For purposes of this subsection:16    "Qualifying pupils" means individuals who (i) are 17residents of the State of Illinois, (ii) are under the age of 1821 at the close of the school year for which a credit is 19sought, and (iii) during the school year for which a credit is 20sought were full-time pupils enrolled in a kindergarten 21through twelfth grade education program at any school, as 22defined in this subsection.23    "Qualified education expense" means the amount incurred on 24behalf of a qualifying pupil in excess of $250 for tuition, 25book fees, and lab fees at the school in which the pupil is 26enrolled during the regular school year.  HB5527- 37 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    "School" means any public or nonpublic elementary or 2secondary school in Illinois that is in compliance with Title 3VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964 and attendance at which 4satisfies the requirements of Section 26-1 of the School Code, 5except that nothing shall be construed to require a child to 6attend any particular public or nonpublic school to qualify 7for the credit under this Section.8    "Custodian" means, with respect to qualifying pupils, an 9Illinois resident who is a parent, the parents, a legal 10guardian, or the legal guardians of the qualifying pupils.11    (n) River Edge Redevelopment Zone site remediation tax 12credit. 13        (i) For tax years ending on or after December 31, 14    2006, a taxpayer shall be allowed a credit against the tax 15    imposed by subsections (a) and (b) of this Section for 16    certain amounts paid for unreimbursed eligible remediation 17    costs, as specified in this subsection. For purposes of 18    this Section, "unreimbursed eligible remediation costs" 19    means costs approved by the Illinois Environmental 20    Protection Agency ("Agency") under Section 58.14a of the 21    Environmental Protection Act that were paid in performing 22    environmental remediation at a site within a River Edge 23    Redevelopment Zone for which a No Further Remediation 24    Letter was issued by the Agency and recorded under Section 25    58.10 of the Environmental Protection Act. The credit must 26    be claimed for the taxable year in which Agency approval   HB5527- 38 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    of the eligible remediation costs is granted. The credit 2    is not available to any taxpayer if the taxpayer or any 3    related party caused or contributed to, in any material 4    respect, a release of regulated substances on, in, or 5    under the site that was identified and addressed by the 6    remedial action pursuant to the Site Remediation Program 7    of the Environmental Protection Act. Determinations as to 8    credit availability for purposes of this Section shall be 9    made consistent with rules adopted by the Pollution 10    Control Board pursuant to the Illinois Administrative 11    Procedure Act for the administration and enforcement of 12    Section 58.9 of the Environmental Protection Act. For 13    purposes of this Section, "taxpayer" includes a person 14    whose tax attributes the taxpayer has succeeded to under 15    Section 381 of the Internal Revenue Code and "related 16    party" includes the persons disallowed a deduction for 17    losses by paragraphs (b), (c), and (f)(1) of Section 267 18    of the Internal Revenue Code by virtue of being a related 19    taxpayer, as well as any of its partners. The credit 20    allowed against the tax imposed by subsections (a) and (b) 21    shall be equal to 25% of the unreimbursed eligible 22    remediation costs in excess of $100,000 per site.23        (ii) A credit allowed under this subsection that is 24    unused in the year the credit is earned may be carried 25    forward to each of the 5 taxable years following the year 26    for which the credit is first earned until it is used. This   HB5527- 39 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    credit shall be applied first to the earliest year for 2    which there is a liability. If there is a credit under this 3    subsection from more than one tax year that is available 4    to offset a liability, the earliest credit arising under 5    this subsection shall be applied first. A credit allowed 6    under this subsection may be sold to a buyer as part of a 7    sale of all or part of the remediation site for which the 8    credit was granted. The purchaser of a remediation site 9    and the tax credit shall succeed to the unused credit and 10    remaining carry-forward period of the seller. To perfect 11    the transfer, the assignor shall record the transfer in 12    the chain of title for the site and provide written notice 13    to the Director of the Illinois Department of Revenue of 14    the assignor's intent to sell the remediation site and the 15    amount of the tax credit to be transferred as a portion of 16    the sale. In no event may a credit be transferred to any 17    taxpayer if the taxpayer or a related party would not be 18    eligible under the provisions of subsection (i).19        (iii) For purposes of this Section, the term "site" 20    shall have the same meaning as under Section 58.2 of the 21    Environmental Protection Act.22    (o) For each of taxable years during the Compassionate Use 23of Medical Cannabis Program, a surcharge is imposed on all 24taxpayers on income arising from the sale or exchange of 25capital assets, depreciable business property, real property 26used in the trade or business, and Section 197 intangibles of   HB5527- 40 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1an organization registrant under the Compassionate Use of 2Medical Cannabis Program Act. The amount of the surcharge is 3equal to the amount of federal income tax liability for the 4taxable year attributable to those sales and exchanges. The 5surcharge imposed does not apply if:6        (1) the medical cannabis cultivation center 7    registration, medical cannabis dispensary registration, or 8    the property of a registration is transferred as a result 9    of any of the following:10            (A) bankruptcy, a receivership, or a debt 11        adjustment initiated by or against the initial 12        registration or the substantial owners of the initial 13        registration;14            (B) cancellation, revocation, or termination of 15        any registration by the Illinois Department of Public 16        Health;17            (C) a determination by the Illinois Department of 18        Public Health that transfer of the registration is in 19        the best interests of Illinois qualifying patients as 20        defined by the Compassionate Use of Medical Cannabis 21        Program Act;22            (D) the death of an owner of the equity interest in 23        a registrant;24            (E) the acquisition of a controlling interest in 25        the stock or substantially all of the assets of a 26        publicly traded company;  HB5527- 41 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1            (F) a transfer by a parent company to a wholly 2        owned subsidiary; or3            (G) the transfer or sale to or by one person to 4        another person where both persons were initial owners 5        of the registration when the registration was issued; 6        or7        (2) the cannabis cultivation center registration, 8    medical cannabis dispensary registration, or the 9    controlling interest in a registrant's property is 10    transferred in a transaction to lineal descendants in 11    which no gain or loss is recognized or as a result of a 12    transaction in accordance with Section 351 of the Internal 13    Revenue Code in which no gain or loss is recognized.14    (p) Pass-through entity tax. 15        (1) For taxable years ending on or after December 31, 16    2021, a partnership (other than a publicly traded 17    partnership under Section 7704 of the Internal Revenue 18    Code) or Subchapter S corporation may elect to apply the 19    provisions of this subsection. A separate election shall 20    be made for each taxable year. Such election shall be made 21    at such time, and in such form and manner as prescribed by 22    the Department, and, once made, is irrevocable. 23        (2) Entity-level tax. A partnership or Subchapter S 24    corporation electing to apply the provisions of this 25    subsection shall be subject to a tax for the privilege of 26    earning or receiving income in this State in an amount   HB5527- 42 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    equal to 4.95% of the taxpayer's net income for the 2    taxable year. 3        (3) Net income defined. 4            (A) In general. For purposes of paragraph (2), the 5        term net income has the same meaning as defined in 6        Section 202 of this Act, except that, for tax years 7        ending on or after December 31, 2023, a deduction 8        shall be allowed in computing base income for 9        distributions to a retired partner to the extent that 10        the partner's distributions are exempt from tax under 11        Section 203(a)(2)(F) of this Act. In addition, the 12        following modifications shall not apply: 13                (i) the standard exemption allowed under 14            Section 204; 15                (ii) the deduction for net losses allowed 16            under Section 207; 17                (iii) in the case of an S corporation, the 18            modification under Section 203(b)(2)(S); and 19                (iv) in the case of a partnership, the 20            modifications under Section 203(d)(2)(H) and 21            Section 203(d)(2)(I). 22            (B) Special rule for tiered partnerships. If a 23        taxpayer making the election under paragraph (1) is a 24        partner of another taxpayer making the election under 25        paragraph (1), net income shall be computed as 26        provided in subparagraph (A), except that the taxpayer   HB5527- 43 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1        shall subtract its distributive share of the net 2        income of the electing partnership (including its 3        distributive share of the net income of the electing 4        partnership derived as a distributive share from 5        electing partnerships in which it is a partner). 6        (4) Credit for entity level tax. Each partner or 7    shareholder of a taxpayer making the election under this 8    Section shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 9    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 10    for the taxable year of the partnership or Subchapter S 11    corporation for which an election is in effect ending 12    within or with the taxable year of the partner or 13    shareholder in an amount equal to 4.95% times the partner 14    or shareholder's distributive share of the net income of 15    the electing partnership or Subchapter S corporation, but 16    not to exceed the partner's or shareholder's share of the 17    tax imposed under paragraph (1) which is actually paid by 18    the partnership or Subchapter S corporation. If the 19    taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S corporation that 20    is itself a partner of a partnership making the election 21    under paragraph (1), the credit under this paragraph shall 22    be allowed to the taxpayer's partners or shareholders (or 23    if the partner is a partnership or Subchapter S 24    corporation then its partners or shareholders) in 25    accordance with the determination of income and 26    distributive share of income under Sections 702 and 704   HB5527- 44 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    and Subchapter S of the Internal Revenue Code. If the 2    amount of the credit allowed under this paragraph exceeds 3    the partner's or shareholder's liability for tax imposed 4    under subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act 5    for the taxable year, such excess shall be treated as an 6    overpayment for purposes of Section 909 of this Act. 7        (5) Nonresidents. A nonresident individual who is a 8    partner or shareholder of a partnership or Subchapter S 9    corporation for a taxable year for which an election is in 10    effect under paragraph (1) shall not be required to file 11    an income tax return under this Act for such taxable year 12    if the only source of net income of the individual (or the 13    individual and the individual's spouse in the case of a 14    joint return) is from an entity making the election under 15    paragraph (1) and the credit allowed to the partner or 16    shareholder under paragraph (4) equals or exceeds the 17    individual's liability for the tax imposed under 18    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 201 of this Act for the 19    taxable year.20        (6) Liability for tax. Except as provided in this 21    paragraph, a partnership or Subchapter S making the 22    election under paragraph (1) is liable for the 23    entity-level tax imposed under paragraph (2). If the 24    electing partnership or corporation fails to pay the full 25    amount of tax deemed assessed under paragraph (2), the 26    partners or shareholders shall be liable to pay the tax   HB5527- 45 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    assessed (including penalties and interest). Each partner 2    or shareholder shall be liable for the unpaid assessment 3    based on the ratio of the partner's or shareholder's share 4    of the net income of the partnership over the total net 5    income of the partnership. If the partnership or 6    Subchapter S corporation fails to pay the tax assessed 7    (including penalties and interest) and thereafter an 8    amount of such tax is paid by the partners or 9    shareholders, such amount shall not be collected from the 10    partnership or corporation. 11        (7) Foreign tax. For purposes of the credit allowed 12    under Section 601(b)(3) of this Act, tax paid by a 13    partnership or Subchapter S corporation to another state 14    which, as determined by the Department, is substantially 15    similar to the tax imposed under this subsection, shall be 16    considered tax paid by the partner or shareholder to the 17    extent that the partner's or shareholder's share of the 18    income of the partnership or Subchapter S corporation 19    allocated and apportioned to such other state bears to the 20    total income of the partnership or Subchapter S 21    corporation allocated or apportioned to such other state. 22        (8) Suspension of withholding. The provisions of 23    Section 709.5 of this Act shall not apply to a partnership 24    or Subchapter S corporation for the taxable year for which 25    an election under paragraph (1) is in effect. 26        (9) Requirement to pay estimated tax. For each taxable   HB5527- 46 -LRB104 18122 HLH 31561 b1    year for which an election under paragraph (1) is in 2    effect, a partnership or Subchapter S corporation is 3    required to pay estimated tax for such taxable year under 4    Sections 803 and 804 of this Act if the amount payable as 5    estimated tax can reasonably be expected to exceed $500. 6        (10) The provisions of this subsection shall apply 7    only with respect to taxable years for which the 8    limitation on individual deductions applies under Section 9    164(b)(6) of the Internal Revenue Code. 10(Source: P.A. 103-9, eff. 6-7-23; 103-396, eff. 1-1-24; 11103-595, eff. 6-26-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 104-453, eff. 1212-12-25.) 13    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 14becoming law.